Washington statutes.
RCW 3.50.005

Legislative finding—Alternative court structure for cities and towns of four hundred thousand or less.

The legislature finds that there is a multitude of statutes governing the municipal courts of the state. This situation is confusing and misleading to attorneys, judges, court personnel, and others who work with the municipal courts. The legislature therefore finds that a reorganization of the municipal courts of the state would allow those courts to operate in a more effective and efficient manner. This chapter provides a court structure which may be used by cities and towns with a population of four hundred thousand or less which choose to operate under this chapter.

[ 1984 c 258 s 101.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Application—1984 c 258 ss 101-139: "The enactment of sections 101 through 139 of this act shall not affect any case, proceeding, appeal, or other matter pending in any court operating under Title 35 or 35A RCW on the effective date of this act [July 1, 1984]. The enactment of sections 101 through 139 of this act shall not have the effect of terminating or in any way modifying any right or liability, civil or criminal, which may be in existence on the effective date of this act [July 1, 1984]." [ 1984 c 258 s 128.]